Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2594.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 5-33.2-1, 5-33.2-13, 5-33.2-13.1, 5-33.2-13.2, 5-33.2-15, 5-33.2-17
and 5-33.2-24 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-33.2 entitled "Funeral Director/Embalmer and
Funeral Service Establishments" are hereby amended to read as follows:
5-33.2-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Board” means the state board of funeral directors/embalmers.
(2) “Cremation” means a two-part (2) procedure where a dead human body or body parts
are reduced by direct flames to residue that includes bone fragments and the pulverization of the
bone fragments to a coarse powdery consistency.
(3) “Department” means the Rhode Island department of health.
(4) "Disposition facility" means a building or structure utilized for the reducing of human
remains by means of cremation or natural organic reduction.
(4)(5) “Division” means the division of professional regulation created under chapter 26 of
this title.
(5)(6) “Embalmer” means any person who has completed an internship; full course of study
at an accredited mortuary science school; has passed the national board examination; and is
engaged in the practice or profession of embalming, as defined in this section.
(6)(7) “Embalming” means the practice, science, or profession of preserving, disinfecting,

and preparing in any manner dead human bodies for burial, cremation, or transportation.
(7)(8) “Funeral” means a period following death in which there are religious services or
other rites or ceremonies with the body of the deceased present.
(8)(9)(i) “Funeral directing” means:
(A) Conducting funeral services; or
(B) The arrangement for disposition of dead human bodies, except in the case of any
religion where the preparation of the body or the provision of funeral services should be done
according to religious custom or belief.
(ii) Only funeral directors/embalmers working for a licensed funeral establishment are
allowed to meet with families for the purpose of arranging funerals. Provided, that any person who
assumed an ownership interest from his or her spouse or any widow or widower of a licensed
funeral director who at the time of November 1, 1995, has been meeting with families to arrange
for the conducting of funeral services is allowed to continue this practice.
(9)(10) “Funeral director/embalmer” means any person engaged, or holding himself or
herself out as engaged, in the practice or profession of funeral directing, and the science, practice,
or profession of embalming as previously defined, including a funeral director of record, who may
be a funeral director at more than one establishment or any other word or title intending to imply
or designate him or her as a funeral director/embalmer, undertaker, or mortician. The holder of this
license must be the holder of an embalmer’s license.
(10)(11) “Funeral director/embalmer intern” means any person engaged in learning the
practice or profession of funeral directing and the science, practice, or profession of embalming
under the instruction and supervision of a funeral director/embalmer licensed and registered under
the provisions of this chapter and actively engaged in the practice or profession of funeral directing
and embalming in this state.
(11)(12) “Funeral establishment” means a fixed place, establishment, or premises, licensed
by the department, devoted to the activities that are incident, convenient, or related to the care and
preparation, arrangement, financial and otherwise, for the funeral, transportation, burial, or other
disposition of human dead bodies and including, but not limited to, a suitable room with all
instruments and supplies used for the storage or preparation of dead human bodies for burial or
other disposition.
(12)(13) “Funeral merchandise” means those items that are normally presented for sale as
part of the funeral home operation on a for-profit basis. These items include caskets, sealed,
warranted outer-burial containers, and burial clothing. Not included are urns, grave markers, and
non-sealed outer-burial containers. All persons engaged in the sale of funeral merchandise must
LC003386 - Page 2 of 20

comply with the provisions of chapter 33.1 of this title.
(14) "Natural organic reduction (NOR)" means the contained, accelerated conversion of
human remains to soil.
(15) "Natural organic reduction facility" means a structure, room or other space in a
building or real property where natural organic reduction of a human body occurs.
(13)(16) “Person” includes individuals, partnerships, corporations, limited-liability
companies, associations, and organizations of all kinds.
(14)(17) “Practice of funeral service” means a person engaging in providing shelter, care,
and custody of human dead remains; in the practice of preparing of the human dead remains by
embalming or other methods for burial or other disposition; in entering into a funeral service
contract; engaging in the functions of funeral directing and/or embalming as presently known,
including those stipulated within this chapter and as defined in the Federal Trade Commission
“Funeral Rule.” The practice of conducting funeral services shall be conducted in the presence of
a licensed funeral director/embalmer.
5-33.2-13. Funeral establishment and branch officer — Crematories — Inspections
— Denial of access Funeral establishment and branch officer — Disposition facilities —
Inspections — Denial of access.
(a) Any licensed funeral director/embalmer employed, authorized, and empowered by the
division of professional regulation may enter any funeral establishment, funeral-establishment
branch office, or crematory disposition facility licensed under the provisions of this chapter, during
the hours the funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch office, or crematory disposition
facility is open for business, for the purpose of inspecting the sanitary conditions, complaint
investigations, and ascertaining if the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations are
being observed in the operation of the funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch office,
or crematory disposition facility. The inspector may request permission from the department to be
accompanied by another employee of the department of health prior to an inspection. Failure or
refusal of the person in charge of that funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch office,
or crematory disposition facility to permit the inspection at all reasonable times shall be deemed
sufficient cause for the revocation of any license issued to the funeral establishment, funeral-
establishment branch office, or crematory disposition facility and any certificate of approval issued
by the division.
(b) Funeral establishments and branch offices and crematories disposition facilities
licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall be inspected at least twice each year. Inspections
shall include all areas of sanitation and public health, complaint investigations, as well as
LC003386 - Page 3 of 20

conformity with applicable section of this chapter and the rules and regulations.
5-33.2-13.1. Crematories — License and inspection Disposition facilities — License
and inspection.
No crematory disposition facility owned or operated by or located on property licensed as
a funeral establishment or at another location or by a cemetery shall conduct cremations or natural
organic reduction without first having applied for and obtained a license from the department.
Applications for the crematory disposition facility license shall be made on forms furnished by the
division accompanied by the application fee as set forth in § 23-1-54. Upon receipt of a completed
application, the department shall issue a license. A license shall be issued to a specific licensee for
a specific location and is not transferable. The facility and licensee shall meet all requirements as
prescribed by the rules and regulations established by the department, not inconsistent with this
chapter.
5-33.2-13.2. Cremation of human remains Disposition of human remains.
(a)(1) Cremation Disposition shall not take place until the necessary permits and consents
are issued pursuant to § 23-3-18.
(2) A crematory disposition facility shall not take custody of unidentified human remains.
(3) Human remains designated for cremation shall be cremated without unreasonable
delay. Disposition of human remains shall occur without unreasonable delay.
(4) When the crematory disposition facility is unable to cremate initiate the disposition
process of the human remains immediately upon taking custody, the crematory disposition facility
shall provide a holding facility that complies with any applicable public health law and that
preserves the dignity of the human remains.
(5) Holding facilities must be secure from access by all unauthorized persons.
(6) A crematory disposition facility shall not simultaneously cremate conduct the process
of reduction of human remains of more than one human remain within the same cremation
disposition chamber. The processing, packaging, storage, and disposition of cremated remains
following cremation or natural organic reduction shall be as prescribed in the rules and regulations
promulgated by the department of health division of professional regulation.
(7) A crematory disposition facility or funeral home shall be authorized to dispose of the
cremated remains that have been abandoned at the crematory disposition facility or funeral home
for more than six (6) months. All reasonable attempts must be made and diligence exercised to
contact the person in charge who authorized the cremation.
(b) This section does not apply to the cremation of various body parts from different human
bodies.
LC003386 - Page 4 of 20

5-33.2-15. Annual renewal of licenses.
All licenses issued under the provisions of this chapter must be renewed annually by their
holders, who shall pay to the division a yearly renewal fee for the renewal of a funeral
director/embalmer’s license, and additional fees for each funeral-establishment branch office
license and for the crematory disposition facility license. These fees are as set forth in § 23-1-54.
On or before the fifteenth day of November in each year, the division shall mail to each licensed
funeral director/embalmer and to each licensed funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch
office, and crematory disposition facility an application for the renewal. Applications, accompanied
by the fee for renewal, shall be filed with the division on or before the thirty-first day of December
in each year. Applications filed after the thirty-first of December and on or before the fifteenth of
January must be accompanied by a fee as set forth in § 23-1-54 for funeral director/embalmers and
funeral establishments in addition to the previously established renewal fees. Any funeral
director/embalmer who acts or holds himself or herself out as a funeral director/embalmer after his
or her certificate has been lapsed shall be punished as provided in this chapter. Any funeral
establishment, funeral-establishment branch office, or crematory disposition facility that acts or
holds itself out as a funeral establishment after its license has lapsed shall be punished as provided
in this chapter.
5-33.2-17. Revocation or suspension of license.
(a) The division has the power to refuse to issue or may revoke or suspend any license
issued by it under this chapter, after written notification and a hearing before the board for gross
incompetency, for unprofessional conduct, which is defined to include:
(1) Conviction of a felony;
(2) Misrepresentations made of services, goods, or of funeral prices or fraud committed as
a holder of a license for the practice of embalming, funeral directing, or the holder of a license as a
funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch, or crematory disposition facility;
(3) False or misleading advertising as the holder of a license for the practice of embalming,
funeral directing, or the holder of a license as a funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch,
or crematory disposition facility; violating any regulations relating to “truth in advertising”; or
failure to do the following:
(i) List only full-time employees or those having an ownership interest in the
advertisements including his or her title, which clearly identifies one’s duties;
(ii) List the name of the funeral director of record for the establishment in all advertising;
(iii) A deceased founder may be listed in advertisements with the notation “founder”
following the name;
LC003386 - Page 5 of 20

(4) Solicitation of dead human bodies by any licensed embalmer, funeral director, funeral
attendant, or the holder of license as a funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch or
crematory disposition facility, its agents, assistants, or employees, whether the solicitation occurs
after death or while death is impending; provided, that this does not prohibit general advertising;
(5) Employment directly or indirectly of any intern, agent, assistant, employee, or other
person, on part or full-time, or on commission, for the purpose of calling upon individuals or
institutions by whose influence dead human bodies may be turned over to a particular funeral
establishment;
(6) The direct or indirect payment or offer of payment of a commission by any funeral
establishment, funeral-establishment branch, or crematory disposition facility, its agents, assistants,
or employees for the purpose of securing business;
(7) Solicitation or acceptance by a licensed funeral director/embalmer, or the holder of a
license as a funeral establishment, funeral-establishment branch, or crematory disposition facility,
of any commission or bonus or rebate in consideration of recommending or causing a dead human
body to be disposed of in any crematory disposition facility, mausoleum, or cemetery;
(8) Using any funeral merchandise previously used in whole or in part without prior written
permission of the person selecting and/or paying for the use of the merchandise;
(9) Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter;
(10) Violation of any state law or rule and regulation affecting the handling, custody, care,
transportation, or final disposition of dead human bodies;
(11) Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining or renewing a license;
(12) Refusing to properly release a dead human body to the custody of the person or entity
who has the legal right to effect the release and authorized cost has been paid;
(13) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice funeral directing and embalming
or holding oneself out as a licensed funeral director/embalmer;
(14) Failure to secure any required permit for removal or burial of dead human remains
prior to interment or final disposition;
(15) Knowingly making any false statement on a certificate of death;
(16) Violation of chapter 33.1 of this title entitled “Funeral Service Contracts”;
(17) Discriminating in services because of race, creed, color, or national origin;
(18) Permitting non-funeral service licensees to make arrangements for a funeral prior to,
or at, need unless exempted under chapter 33.1 of this title or a registered intern under the
supervision of a licensee;
(19) Substantial or repeated violations of the rules and regulations of the Federal Trade
LC003386 - Page 6 of 20

Commission and/or the Occupational Safety and Health Administration, or for other violations
deemed sufficient; provided, that before any license is revoked or suspended, the license holder
shall have notice, in writing, of the charge or charges against him or her and shall have reasonable
opportunity to be heard in his or her defense.
(b) Any person whose certificate has been revoked or suspended may apply to have the
certificate reissued, and the certificate shall be reissued to him or her upon a satisfactory showing
that disqualification has ceased.
5-33.2-24. Proper authority for funeral arrangements and disposition of human
remains.
Every licensed funeral director/embalmer, licensed funeral establishment, licensed
crematory disposition facility, and cemetery shall comply with the following rules with respect to
proper authority for funeral arrangements and disposition of human remains:
(1) If a licensed funeral establishment is a party to a funeral service contract, as defined in
§ 5-33.1-2, for the benefit of a deceased person, only when executed by the principal, him or herself,
and the contract is still in effect at the time of that person’s death, the terms of that contract shall
control the nature of the funeral goods and services to be provided; the manner in which funeral
services are to be conducted for the deceased; and the final disposition of the deceased person’s
remains to the full extent provided in that contract. When the contract is executed by the principal,
him or herself, and specifies cremation or natural organic reduction as the chosen disposition, the
contract is considered sufficient legal authorization for cremation or natural organic reduction. No
licensed funeral establishment, licensed crematory disposition facility, or cemetery, nor any of its
agents or employees, may cancel or materially alter any of the arrangements specified in that
contract, even if requested to do so by a member of the deceased person’s family or a funeral
planning agent designated pursuant to chapter 33.3 of this title unless compliance with the terms of
the original contract would result in a violation of any applicable federal, state, or local law or
regulation, notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter.
(2) To the extent that there is no funeral service contract in effect at the time of death for
the benefit of the deceased person, indicating the wishes of the deceased person with respect to the
nature of the funeral goods and services to be provided, the manner in which funeral services are
to be conducted, or the final disposition of the deceased person’s remains, then the funeral
establishment and its agents or employees shall follow the directions of the deceased person’s
survivors in the following order of priority:
(i) An agent designated pursuant to chapter 33.3 of this title, if any;
(ii) The surviving spouse or domestic partner of the deceased;
LC003386 - Page 7 of 20

(iii) The surviving adult children of the deceased;
(iv) The surviving parent(s) of the deceased over the age of eighteen (18), or, if the
deceased is a minor, and there is a custody order relative to that child, the custodial parent, after he
or she signs an affidavit attesting that he or she does not know the whereabouts of the other parent;
(v) The surviving brother(s) or sister(s) of the deceased;
(vi) The surviving adult grandchildren of the deceased;
(vii) The surviving adult niece(s) or nephew(s) of the deceased;
(viii) The guardian of the person of the deceased at the time of his or her death.
(3) All licensed funeral directors/embalmers, licensed funeral establishments, licensed
crematories disposition facilities, cemeteries, and all their agents and employees shall be held
harmless, and shall not be subject to civil suit, either as individual(s), partnership(s), or
corporation(s), for complying with the provisions of this chapter.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, “domestic partner” shall be defined as a person who,
prior to the decedent’s death, was in an exclusive, intimate, and committed relationship with the
decedent and who certifies by affidavit that their relationship met the following qualifications:
(i) Both partners were at least eighteen (18) years of age and were mentally competent to
contract;
(ii) Neither partner is married to anyone else;
(iii) Partners were not related by blood to a degree that would prohibit marriage in the state
of Rhode Island;
(iv) Partners resided together and had resided together for at least one year at the time of
death; and
(v) Partners were financially interdependent as evidenced by at least two (2) of the
following:
(A) Domestic partnership agreement or relationship contract;
(B) Joint mortgage or joint ownership of primary residence;
(C) Two (2) of the following:
(I) Joint ownership of motor vehicle;
(II) Joint checking account;
(III) Joint credit account;
(IV) Joint lease; and/or
(D) The domestic partner had been designated as a beneficiary for the decedent’s will,
retirement contract, or life insurance.
SECTION 2. Section 23-1-54 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-1 entitled "Department
LC003386 - Page 8 of 20

of Health" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-1-54. Fees payable to the department of health.
Fees payable to the department shall be as follows:
PROFESSION RIGL Section Description of Fee FEE
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-10(a) Renewal application $25.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-10(a) Renewal application:
Manicuring Instructors and manicurists $25.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-10(b) Minimum late renewal fee $25.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-10(b) Maximum late renewal fee $100.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-11[c] Application fee $25.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-11[c] Application fee: manicuring
Instructors and manicurists $25.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-13 Demonstrator’s permit $90.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-15 Shop license: initial $170.00
Barbers/hairdressers 5-10-15 Shop license: renewal $170.00
Veterinarians 5-25-10 Application fee $40.00
Veterinarians 5-25-11 Examination fee $540.00
Veterinarians 5-25-12(a) Renewal fee $580.00
Veterinarians 5-25-12[c] Late renewal fee $120.00
Podiatrists 5-29-7 Application fee $240.00
Podiatrists 5-29-11 Renewal fee: minimum $240.00
Podiatrists 5-29-11 Renewal fee: maximum $540.00
Podiatrists 5-29-13 Limited registration $65.00
Podiatrists 5-29-14 Limited registration:
Academic faculty $240.00
Podiatrists 5-29-14 Application fee:
Renewal minimum $240.00
Podiatrists 5-29-14 Application fee:
Renewal maximum $440.00
Chiropractors 5-30-6 Examination fee: $210.00
Chiropractors 5-30-7 Examination exemption fee $210.00
Chiropractors 5-30-8(b) Exam Physiotherapy $210.00
Chiropractors 5-30-8(b) Exam chiro and $210.00
physiotherapy
LC003386 - Page 9 of 20

Chiropractors 5-30-12 Renewal fee $210.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-6(d) Dentist: application fee $965.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-6(d) Dental hygienist:
application fee $65.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-6(d) Reexamination: dentist $965.00
Dentists/dental hygienist 5-31.1-6(d) Reexamination: hygienist $65.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-21(b) Reinstatement fee dentist $90.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-21(b) Reinstatement fee hygienist $90.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-21(c) Inactive status: dentist $220.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-21(c) Inactive status: hygienist $40.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-22 Limited registration $65.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-23[c] Limited reg: Academic faculty $965.00
Dentists/dental hygienists 5-31.1-23[c] Limited reg:
Academic faculty renewal $500.00
Electrolysis 5-32-3 Application fee $25.00
Electrolysis 5-32-6(b) Renewal fee $25.00
Electrolysis 5-32-7 Reciprocal license fee $25.00
Electrolysis 5-32-17 Teaching license $25.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-12 Funeral establishment license $120.00
Funeral services establishments
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-15 Renewal: funeral/director - $90.00
Funeral services establishments embalmer $30.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-12 Funeral branch ofc license $90.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-13.1 Crematories Disposition:
Facilities application fee $120.00
Funeral services establishments
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-15 Renewal: funeral/director
Funeral Svcs establishments establishment $120.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-15 Additional branch office
Funeral services Establishments licenses $120.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-15 Crematory Disposition facility
renewal fee
Funeral svcs establishments $120.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-15 Late renewal fee
LC003386 - Page 10 of 20

Funeral svcs establishments (All license types) $25.00
Funeral directors/embalmers 5-33.2-16(a) Intern registration fee
Funeral Services establishments- $25.00
Nurses 5-34-12 RN Application fee $135.00
Nurses 5-34-16 LPN Application fee $45.00
Nurses 5-34-19 Renewal fee: RN $135.00
Nurses 5-34-19 Renewal fee: LPN $45.00
Nurses 5-34-37 RNP application fee $80.00
Nurses 5-34-37 RNP renewal fee $80.00
Nurses 5-34-37 RNP prescriptive privileges $65.00
Nurses 5-34-40.3 Clin nurse spec application $80.00
Nurses 5-34-40.3 Clin nurse spec renewal $80.00
Nurses 5-34-40.3 Clin nurse spec Rx privilege $65.00
Nurse anesthetists 5-34.2-4(a) CRNA application fee $80.00
Nurse anesthetists 5-34.2-4(b) CRNA renewal fee $80.00
Optometrists 5-35.1-4 Application fee $280.00
Optometrists 5-35.1-7 Renewal fee $280.00
Optometrists 5-35.1-7 Late fee $90.00
Optometrists 5-35.1-7 Reactivation of license fee $65.00
Optometrists 5-35.1-19(b) Violations of section $650.00
Optometrists 5-35.1-20 Violations of chapter $260.00
Opticians 5-35.2-3 Application fee $30.00
Physicians 5-37-2 Application fee $1,090.00
Physicians 5-37-2 Re-examination fee $1,090.00
Physicians 5-37-10(b) Late renewal fee $170.00
Physicians 5-37-16 Limited registration fee $65.00
Physicians 5-37-16.1 Ltd reg: academic faculty $600.00
Physicians 5-37-16.1 Ltd reg: academic
Faculty renewal $170.00
Acupuncture 5-37.2-10 Application fee $310.00
Acupuncture 5-37.2-13(4) Acupuncture assistant $310.00
Licensure fee $170.00
Social workers 5-39.1-9 Application fee $70.00
Social workers 5-39.1-9 Renewal fee $70.00
LC003386 - Page 11 of 20

Physical therapists 5-40-8 Application fee $155.00
Physical therapists 5-40-8.1 Application: physical $50.00
therapy assistants
Physical therapists 5-40-10(a) Renewal fee:
Physical therapists $155.00
Physical therapists 5-40-10(a) Renewal fee: Physical
therapy assistants $50.00
Physical therapists 5-40-10[c] Late renewals $50.00
Occupational therapists 5-40.1-12(2) Renewal fee $140.00
Occupational therapists 5-40.1-12(5) Late renewal fee $50.00
Occupational therapists 5-40.1-12(b) Reactivation fee $140.00
Occupational therapists 5-40.1-13 Application fee $140.00
Psychologists 5-44-12 Application fee $230.00
Psychologists 5-44-13 Temporary permit $120.00
Psychologists 5-44-15[c] Renewal fee $230.00
Psychologists 5-44-15(e) Late renewal fee $50.00
Nursing home administrators 5-45-10 Renewal fee $160.00
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-1(14) Speech lang support
personnel: late filing $90.00
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-9(a) Application fee: Audiologist $65.00
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-9(a) Application fee:
Speech Pathologist $145.00
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-9(a) Renewal fee: Audiologist $65.00
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-9(a) Renewal fee: Speech $145.00
Pathologist
Speech pathologist/ audiologists 5-48-9(a) Provisional license:
renewal fee $65.00
Speech pathologist/au- 5-48-9(b) Late renewal fee $50.00
diologists
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-9(d)(1) Reinstatement fee:
audiologist $65.00
Speech pathologist/audiologists 5-48-9(d)(1) Reinstatement fee:
audiologist $65.00
speech pathologists $145.00
LC003386 - Page 12 of 20

personnel: late filing $65.00
Hearing aid dealers/fitters 5-49-6(a) License endorsement
Examination fee $25.00
Hearing aid dealers/fitters 5-49-8(b) Temporary permit fee $25.00
Hearing aid dealers/fitters 5-49-8(d) Temporary permit $35.00
renewal fee
Hearing aid dealers/fitters 5-49-11(a)(1) License fee $25.00
Hearing aid dealers/fitters 5-49-11(b) License renewal fee $25.00
Hearing aid dealers/fitters 5-49-11[c] License renewal late fee $25.00
Physician assistants 5-54-9(4) Application fee $110.00
Physician assistants 5-54-11(b) Renewal fee $110.00
Orthotics/prosthetic practice 5-59.1-5 Application fee $120.00
Orthotics/prosthetic practice 5-59.1-12 Renewal fee $120.00
Athletic trainers 5-60-11 Application fee $60.00
Athletic trainers 5-60-11 Renewal fee $60.00
Athletic trainers 5-60-11 Late renewal fee $25.00
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-16 Application fee: Marriage/
Marriage and family Family therapist $130.00
therapists
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-16 Application fee: Mental
Marriage and family therapists Health counselors $70.00
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-16 Reexamination fee:
Marriage and family therapists Marriage/family therapist $130.00
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-16 Reexamination fee:
Marriage and family therapists Mental health counselors $70.00
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-17(a) Renewal fee: Marriage/
Marriage and Family therapists Family therapist $130.00
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-17(a) Renewal fee:
Marriage and Family therapist Mental health counselor $50.00
Mental health counselors/ 5-63.2-17(b) Late renewal fee:
Marriage and Family therapist Marriage and family $90.00
therapist
Dieticians/nutritionists 5-64-6(b) Application fee $75.00
Dieticians/nutritionists 5-64-7 Graduate status:
LC003386 - Page 13 of 20

Application fee: $75.00
Dieticians/nutritionists 5-64-8 Renewal fee $75.00
Dieticians/nutritionists 5-64-8 Reinstatement fee $75.00
Radiologic technologists 5-68.1-10 Application fee maximum $190.00
Licensed chemical de- 5-69-9 Application fee $75.00
pendency professionals
Licensed chemical de- 5-69-9 Renewal fee $75.00
pendency professionals
Licensed chemical 5-69-9 Application fee $75.00
Licensed chemical 5-69-9 Application fee $75.00
dependency clinical supervisor
Licensed chemical 5-69-9 Renewal fee $75.00
dependency clinical supervisor
Deaf interpreters 5-71-8(a)(3) License fee maximum $25.00
Deaf interpreters 5-71-8(a)(3) License renewal fee $25.00
Milk producers 21-2-7(g)(1) In-state milk processor $160.00
Milk producers 21-2-7(g)(2) Out-of-state milk processor - $160.00
Milk producers 21-2-7(g)(3) Milk distributors $160.00
Frozen desserts 21-9-3(1) In-state wholesale $550.00
Frozen desserts 21-9-3(2) Out-of-state wholesale $160.00
Frozen desserts 21-9-3(3) Retail frozen dess pro- $160.00
cessors
Meats 21-11-4 Wholesale $160.00
Meats 21-11-4 Retail $40.00
Shellfish packing houses 21-14-2 License fee:
Shipper/reshipper $320.00
Shellfish packing houses 21-14-2 License fee:
Shucker packer/repacker $390.00
Non-alcoholic bottled 21-23-2 Bottler permit
beverages, drinks & juices $550.00
Non-alcoholic bottled 21-23-2 Bottle apple cider fee
beverages, drinks and juices $60.00
Farm home food manu- 21-27-6.1(4) Registration fee $65.00
facturers
LC003386 - Page 14 of 20

Cottage Food Manu- 21-27-6.2(4) Registration fee $65.00
facturers
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(1) Food processors wholesale $300.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(2) Food processors retail $120.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(3) Food service establishments
50 seats or less $160.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(3) Food service establishments
more than 50 seats $240.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(3) Mobile food service units $100.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(3) Industrial caterer or
food vending
Machine commissary $280.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(3) Cultural heritage
educational Facility $80.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(4) Vending Machine
Location3 units or less $50.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(4) Vending Machine
Location 4-10 units $100.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(4) Vending Machine
Location = 11 units $120.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(5) Retail Mkt
1-2 cash registers $120.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(5) Retail Market
3-5 cash registers $240.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(5) Retail Market = 6
Cash registers $510.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(6) Retail food peddler $100.00
Food businesses 21-27-10(e)(7) Food warehouses $190.00
Food businesses 21-27-11.2 Certified food safety mgr $50.00
License verification fee 23-1-16.1 All license types $50.00
Tattoo and body piercing 23-1-39 Annual registration
fee: Person $90.00
Tattoo and body piercing 23-1-39 Annual registration fee:
establishment $90.00
LC003386 - Page 15 of 20

Vital records 23-3-25(a)(1) Certificate of birth, fetal
death, death, marriage, birth,
or Certification that such
record Cannot be found $20.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(1) Each duplicate of
certificate of birth,
fetal death, death, marriage,
birth, or certification that
such record cannot be found $15.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(2) Each additional calendar
year Search, if within 3
months of original
search and if receipt of
original search presented $2.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(3) Expedited service $7.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(4) Adoptions, legitimations,
or Paternity determinations $15.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(5) Authorized corrections,
Alterations, and additions $10.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(6) Filing of delayed record
and Examination of docu-
mentary Proof $20.00
Vital records 23-3-25(a)(6) Issuance of certified copy
of a delayed record $20.00
Medical Examiner 23-4-13 Autopsy reports $40.00
Medical Examiner 23-4-13 Cremation and natural
organic reduction disposition
certificates and statistics $30.00
Medical Examiner 23-4-13 Testimony in civil suits:
Minimum/day $650.00
Medical Examiner 23-4-13 Testimony in civil suits:
Maximum/day $3,250.00
Emergency medical 23-4.1-10[c] Annual fee: ambulance
technicians service maximum $540.00
LC003386 - Page 16 of 20

Emergency medical 23-4.1-10[c] Annual fee: vehicle
technicians license maximum $275.00
Emergency medical 23-4.1-10[c] Triennial fee: EMT
technicians license maximum $120.00
Emergency medical 23-4.1-10(c)(2) Exam fee maximum: $120.00
technicians EMT
Emergency medical 23-4.1-10(c)(2) Vehicle inspection
technicians Maximum $190.00
Clinical laboratories 23-16.2-4(a) Clinical laboratory
license
per specialty $650.00
Clinical laboratories 23-16.2-4(a) Laboratory station $650.00
license
Clinical laboratories 23-16.2-4(b) Permit fee $70.00
Health care facilities 23-17-38 Hospital: base fee $16,900.00
annual
Health care facilities 23-17-38 Hospital: annual per $120.00
bed fee
Health care facilities 23-17-38 ESRD: annual fee $3,900.00
Health care facilities 23-17-38 Home nursing-care/
home-
care providers $650.00
Health care facilities 23-17-38 OACF: annual fee $650.00
Assisted living residences/ 23-17.4-15.2(d) License application fee: $220.00
administrators
Assisted living residences/ 23-17.4-15.2(d) License renewal fee: $220.00
administrators
Assisted living residences 23-17.4-31 Annual facility fee: base $330.00
Assisted living residences 23-17.4-31 Annual facility per bed $70.00
Nursing assistant registration 23-17.9-3 Application: competency
evaluation training
program maximum $325.00
Nursing assistant registration 23-17.9-5 Application fee $35.00
Nursing assistant registration 23-17.9-5 Exam fee: skills proficiency $170.00
LC003386 - Page 17 of 20

Nursing assistant registration 23-17.9-6 Registration fee $35.00
Nursing assistant registration 23-17.9-7 Renewal fee $35.00
Sanitarians 23-19.3-5(a) Registration fee $25.00
Sanitarians 23-19.3-5(b) Registration renewal $25.00
Massage therapy 23-20.8-3(e) Massage therapist appl fee $65.00
Massage therapy 23-20.8-3(e) Massage therapist $65.00
renewal fee
Recreational facilities 23-21-2 Application fee $160.00
Swimming pools 23-22-6 Application license:
first pool $250.00
Swimming pools 23-22-6 Additional pool
fee at same location $75.00
Swimming pools 23-22-6 Seasonal application
license: first pool $150.00
Swimming pools 23-22-6 Seasonal additional pool
fee at same location $75.00
Swimming pools 23-22-6 Year-round license
for non-profit $25.00
Swimming pools 23-22-10 Duplicate license $2.00
Swimming pools 23-22-12 Penalty for violations $50.00
Respiratory care practitioners - 23-39-11 Application fee $60.00
Respiratory care practitioners 23-39-11 Renewal fee $60.00
SECTION 3. Section 23-3-18 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-3 entitled "Vital Records"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-3-18. Permits.
(a) The funeral director, his or her duly authorized agent, or another person acting as a duly
authorized agent, who first assumes custody of a dead body or fetus shall prepare a burial-transit
permit prior to final disposition or removal from the state of the body or fetus and within seven (7)
calendar days after death.
(b) The burial-transit permit shall be signed by the funeral director and by the certifying
physician as designated in § 23-3-16(c).
(c) A burial-transit permit issued under the law of another state which accompanies a dead
body or fetus brought into this state shall be authority for final disposition of the body or fetus in
this state.
LC003386 - Page 18 of 20

(d) A permit for disinterment and re-interment shall be required prior to disinterment of a
dead body or fetus except as authorized by regulation or otherwise provided by law. The permit
shall be issued by the local registrar of vital records at the place of disinterment to a licensed funeral
director, embalmer, his or her duly authorized agent, or another person acting as a duly authorized
agent, upon proper application.
(e)(1) The body of a deceased person shall not be cremated within An operator of a
disposition facility shall not cremate or process by means of natural organic reduction or allow the
cremation or processing by means of natural organic reduction of a dead human body until the
passage of at least twenty-four (24) hours after his or her death unless he or she dies of a contagious
or infectious disease. The body shall not be received or cremated or processed by means of natural
organic reduction by any corporation authorized to cremate or conduct the process of natural
organic reduction of the bodies of the dead until its officers have received the burial permit required
by law before burial, and a cremation certificate or natural organic reduction certificate issued by
the Rhode Island office of state medical examiners. A cremation certificate or natural organic
reduction certificate shall be issued only if the office of state medical examiners determines that
the cause and manner of death is such that no further examination or judicial inquiry concerning
the cause and manner of death is necessary.
(2) The cremation certificate or natural organic reduction certificate issued to the funeral
director by the medical examiner, in duplicate, shall accompany the body to the crematory
disposition facility. The crematory disposition facility shall retain the duplicate copy and mail the
original copy to the state division of vital records.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003386
========
LC003386 - Page 19 of 20